Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1598
Commissioners; terms.

(1) In the case of local housing agencies, the commissioners who are first appointed shall be designated to serve for terms of one, two, three, four, and five years, respectively, from the date of their appointment, but thereafter commissioners shall be appointed for terms of five years; and

(2) In the case of housing agencies when the appointing authority has elected to have more than five commissioners as provided in section 71-1594 or has elected to add one or two commissioners to a presently existing housing agency, the sixth commissioner who is first appointed shall be designated to serve for a term of four years and the additional commissioners who are first appointed shall be designated to serve for terms of five years from the date of appointment. Thereafter the commissioners shall be appointed for terms of five years.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 27;

Laws 2018, LB399, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB840, § 8.